Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-550
Sanitary district; enlarged district; resolution; file with county clerk.

The board of trustees shall cause a description of such enlarged district together with a certified copy of the resolution adopted to be filed with the county board of the county wherein such district is situated, and such district as so enlarged shall be deemed an organized sanitary drainage district and the trustees of such original district shall be the trustees of such enlarged district until their successors are duly elected and qualified.

Laws 1955, c. 116, § 2, p. 309.